Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-2,103
Injunction; when issued.

Any person who has obtained approval of fees or assessments pursuant to section 46-2,101, may commence an action to enjoin any person from withdrawing or otherwise using the stored water if the person has not entered into an agreement to pay fees or assessments for such stored water, or has failed and refused to pay a fee or assessment for a period of thirty days from and after the due date of the fee or assessment. No injunction may be obtained against withdrawals from wells with a capacity of less than one hundred gallons per minute which are solely for domestic uses as defined in section 46-613.

Laws 1983, LB 198, § 17.